Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4621
Disposition of unappointed property under released or unexercised nongeneral power.

To the extent a powerholder releases, ineffectively exercises, or fails to exercise a nongeneral power of appointment:

(1) the gift in default clause controls the disposition of the unappointed property; or

(2) if there is no gift in default clause or to the extent the clause is ineffective, the unappointed property:

(A) passes to the permissible appointees if:

(i) the permissible appointees are defined and limited; and

(ii) the terms of the instrument creating the power do not manifest a contrary intent; or

(B) if there is no taker under subdivision (A) of this subdivision, passes under a reversionary interest to the donor or the donor's transferee or successor in interest.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 44.